Louisiana, session 2026, SB38.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 40:2009.2 is hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 40:2009.2(8) and 2009.6(C) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2009.2. Definitions
For the purposes of R.S. 40:2009.1 2009.2 through 2009.19, unless the
context otherwise requires:
* * *
(8) "License" means the permission granted to a person by the Louisiana
Department of Health to operate a nursing facility.
* * *
§2009.6. Denial, revocation, or nonrenewal of license; grounds
* * *
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-164 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 38
C.(1) If the department revokes a nursing facility license for failures
attributed to the nursing facility license holder during an evacuation from his
facility within the effective dates of an executive order or declaration of
emergency or disaster, the department shall hold the license in abeyance and
reissue the license to a person who satisfies licensure requirements in order to
reopen and maintain patient services at the nursing facility or at a replacement
nursing facility in the same geographic area.
(2) If a license to operate a nursing facility is revoked pursuant to
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the department may issue the license to
another person who applies for the license pursuant to R.S. 40:2009.3. The
facility need review or moratorium requirements of R.S. 40:2116.1 shall not
apply to issuance of a license to any person pursuant to the provisions of this
Subsection.
(3) The provisions of this Subsection shall apply to:
(a) An executive order or declaration of emergency or disaster issued
during or after 2021.
(b) A nursing facility in which no alternative nursing facility is located
within ten miles.
Section 2. The department shall update all administrative rules on nursing facility
licensure to comply with the provisions of this Act by emergency rule.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-164 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 38